Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4 PROVIDERS - REIMBURSEMENT
To determine changes in the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee that increase the number of hospitals benefitting from the uses of the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee described in subsections (5)(b)(I) to (5)(b)(IV) of this section or that minimize the number of hospitals that suffer losses as a result of paying the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee;

To recommend to the state department reforms or changes to the inpatient hospital and outpatient hospital reimbursements and quality incentive payments made under the state medical assistance program to increase provider accountability, performance, and reporting;

To direct and oversee the enterprise in seeking, in concert with or through an agreement with the state department if required by federal law, any federal waiver necessary to fund and, in cooperation with the state department and hospitals, support the implementation of a health-care delivery system reform incentive payments program as described in subsection (8) of this section;

To recommend to the state department the schedule and approach to the implementation of subsections (5)(b)(IV) and (5)(b)(V) of this section;

If money in the fund is insufficient to fully fund all of the purposes specified in subsection (5)(b) of this section, to recommend to the state board changes to the expanded eligibility provisions described in subsection (5)(b)(IV) of this section;

To prepare the reports specified in subsection (7)(e) of this section;

To monitor the impact of the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee on the broader health-care marketplace;

To establish requirements for the reports that hospitals must submit to the enterprise to allow the enterprise to calculate the amount of the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee; and

To perform any other duties required to fulfill the enterprise board's charge or those assigned to it by the state board or the executive director.

On or before January 15, 2018, and on or before January 15 each year thereafter, the enterprise board shall submit a written report to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, the joint budget committee of the general assembly, the governor, and the state board. The report shall include, but need not be limited to:

The recommendations made to the state board pursuant to this section;

A description of the formula for how the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee is calculated and the process by which the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee is assessed and collected;

An itemization of the total amount of the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee paid by each hospital and any projected revenue that each hospital is expected to receive due to:

The increased reimbursements made pursuant to subsections (5)(b)(I) and (5)(b)(II) of this section and the quality incentive payments made pursuant to subsection (5)(b)(III) of this section; and

The increased eligibility described in subsections (5)(b)(IV) and (5)(b)(V) of this section;

An itemization of the costs incurred by the enterprise in implementing and administering the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee;

Estimates of the differences between the cost of care provided and the payment received by hospitals on a per-patient basis, aggregated for all hospitals, for patients covered by each of the following:

Medicaid;

Medicare; and

All other payers; and

A summary of:

The efforts made by the enterprise, acting in concert with or through an agreement with the state department if required by federal law, to seek any federal waiver necessary to fund and, in cooperation with the state department and hospitals, support the implementation of a health-care delivery system reform incentive payments program as described in subsection (8) of this section; and

The progress actually made by the enterprise, in cooperation with the state department and hospitals, towards the goal of implementing such a program.

The enterprise board shall calculate the estimates described in subsection (7)(e)(V) of this section by using appropriate information provided to the state department by hospitals and any state department analysis of that information.

The enterprise is subject to the open meetings provisions of the "Colorado Sunshine Act of 1972", contained in part 4 of article 6 of title 24, and the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

For purposes of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, and except as may otherwise be provided by federal law or regulation or state law, the records of the enterprise are public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), regardless of whether the enterprise receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), from all Colorado state and local governments combined.

The enterprise is a public entity for purposes of part 2 of article 57 of title 11.

Health-care delivery system reform incentive payments program - funding and implementation. The enterprise, acting in concert with or through an agreement with the state department if required by federal law, shall seek any federal waiver necessary to fund and, in cooperation with the state department and hospitals, support the implementation, no earlier than October 1, 2019, of a health-care delivery system reform incentive payments program that will improve health-care access and outcomes for individuals served by the state department while efficiently utilizing available financial resources. Such a program must, at a minimum:

Include an initial planning phase to:

Assess needs; and

Develop achievable outcome-based metrics to be used to measure progress towards program goals, including the goals of health-care delivery system integration, improved patient outcomes, and more efficient provision of care; and

Address the following focus areas:

Care coordination and care transition management;

Integration of physical and behavioral health-care services;

Chronic condition management;

Targeted population health; and

Data-driven accountability and outcome measurement.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1448, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP(5)(b) amended, (SB 18-195), ch. 173, p. 1205, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(7)(e.5) added, (HB 19-1001), ch. 52, p. 177, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(5)(b)(VIII) and (6)(a)(I) amended and (4)(a)(II.5), (5)(b)(VIII.5), and (6)(b)(I.3) added, (HB 20-1361), ch. 161, p. 756, § 2, effective June 29; (5)(b)(VIII) and (6)(a)(I) amended and (4)(a)(II.3), (5)(b)(VIII.3), and (6)(b)(I.5) added, (HB 20-1385), ch. 173, p. 795, § 2, effective June 29; IP(4)(a), (5)(b)(VIII), and (6)(a)(I) amended and (4)(a)(II.5), (5)(b)(VIII.7), and (6)(b)(I.7) added, (HB 20-1386), ch. 210, p. 1023, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(4)(a)(II.3), (5)(b)(VIII.3), and (6)(b)(I.5)(B) amended, (SB 21-213), ch. 88, p. 363, § 2, effective May 4; (4)(a)(II.5), (5)(b)(VIII.5), and (6)(b)(I.3) repealed and (6)(a)(I) amended, (SB 21-211), ch. 86, p. 358, § 2, effective May 4; (5)(c) added, (SB 21-286), ch. 395, p. 2626, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(5)(c)(I) amended, (HB 22-1188), ch. 14, p. 124, § 1, effective March 7; (5)(b)(IV)(B) amended, (SB 22-052), ch. 43, p. 216, § 1, effective March 24; (3)(e) and (7)(a)(II) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3371, § 60; effective August 10.